Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-14,109
Legislative committee; conduct open hearings of persons appointed to the commission.

The appropriate legislative committee, to be determined under the rules of the Legislature, shall conduct open hearings with respect to the qualifications of each person appointed to the commission and submitted for approval by the Governor or the Secretary of State, and under no circumstances may such hearings be closed to the public. Hearings need not be held regarding a person who has, in a written letter to the Governor, withdrawn his or her name from consideration.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 109;

Laws 1979, LB 54, § 3.